Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Chapter 2 Agencies, Boards, Commissions and Departments Generally

Cross references. —

For provision that no law shall be passed changing the term or salary of a public officer after his election or appointment, with certain exceptions, see art. 3, § 32, Wyo. Const.

For provision that no person except a qualified elector shall be elected or appointed to any civil or military office in the state, see art. 6, § 15, Wyo. Const.

As to method of selecting officers whose election is not provided for in constitution, see art. 6, § 18, Wyo. Const.

For provisions that all state, city, county, town and school officers (with certain exceptions) shall be paid fixed and definite salaries, see art. 14, § 1, Wyo. Const.

Law reviews. —

For article, “Administrative Law: Rulemaking and Contested Case Practice in Wyoming,” see XXXI Land & Water L. Rev. 685 (1996)

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

17 C.J.S. Contracts § 12.